Illinois, session 104th, HB4764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Garden Act is amended by changing Sections 51, 10, 20, and 25 and by adding Sections 17, 22, and 30 as 6follows: 7    (505 ILCS 87/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Vegetable 9Garden and Backyard Chicken Protection Garden Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    (505 ILCS 87/10)12    Sec. 10. Definitions. Vegetable garden defined. As used in 13this Act: , the term 14    "Backyard chickens" means female chickens kept on a 15residential property for personal, noncommercial purposes. 16"Backyard chickens" does not include roosters.17    "Neighbor consent" means any form of approval, 18nonobjection, endorsement, signature, letter of support, 19attestation, or other action by an adjacent or nearby property 20owner that is required as a condition of obtaining a permit, 21variance, special use, administrative approval, or any other 22authorization for vegetable gardening or the keeping of   HB4764- 2 -LRB104 18137 WRO 31576 b1backyard chickens. "Neighbor consent" includes a requirement 2that adjacent owners be notified in a manner that requires any 3response, feedback, or acknowledgment in order for the 4applicant to receive approval. "Neighbor consent" does not 5include notice provided solely for informational purposes. 6    "Vegetable vegetable garden" means any plot of ground or 7elevated soil bed on residential property where vegetables, 8herbs, fruits, flowers, pollinator plants, leafy greens, or 9other edible plants are cultivated.10(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    (505 ILCS 87/17 new)12    Sec. 17. Right to keep backyard chickens.13    (a) Notwithstanding any other laws a person shall have the 14right to keep backyard chickens on the property where the 15person resides, subject to reasonable municipal regulations 16consistent with this Act.17    (b) Municipalities may establish reasonable regulations 18governing backyard chickens, including, but not limited to, 19setbacks, sanitation requirements, enclosure standards, 20nuisance control requirements, predator-proofing 21requirements, and limitations on the number of hens that may 22be kept.23    (c) Municipalities may require notice to adjacent property 24owners regarding backyard chickens, if the notice does not 25require or solicit any form of neighbor consent as defined in   HB4764- 3 -LRB104 18137 WRO 31576 b1this Act. 2    (505 ILCS 87/20)3    Sec. 20. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 4vegetable gardens or backyard chickens in a manner 5inconsistent with this Act. This Section is a limitation under 6subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 7Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 8powers and functions exercised by the State.9(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.) 10    (505 ILCS 87/22 new)11    Sec. 22. Neighbor consent prohibited.12    (a) A municipality may not condition the cultivation of 13vegetable gardens or the keeping of backyard chickens on 14neighbor consent.15    (b) A municipality may not require any form of neighbor 16consent, including but not limited to:17        (1) approval by adjacent or nearby property owners;18        (2) signatures, letters of support, or attestations;19        (3) submissions showing that neighbors do not object; 20    or21        (4) any process by which neighbors have a veto or 22    approval right over an individual's vegetable garden or 23    backyard chickens.24    (c) Any municipal ordinance, rule, regulation, or   HB4764- 4 -LRB104 18137 WRO 31576 b1permitting process that contains a neighbor-consent 2requirement is void and unenforceable to the extent of the 3neighbor-consent provision. All other portions of the 4ordinance shall remain in effect.5    (d) A municipality may not adopt any ordinance or 6regulation in the future that includes a neighbor-consent 7requirement for vegetable gardens or backyard chickens. 8    (505 ILCS 87/25)9    Sec. 25. State and local regulation still permitted. 10Notwithstanding Section 20 of this Act notwithstanding, this 11Act does not preclude the adoption of a regulation or local 12ordinance of general nature that does not specifically 13regulate backyard chickens, including, but not limited to, 14regulations and ordinances relating to setbacks, sanitation 15requirements, enclosure standards, nuisance control 16requirements, predator-proofing requirements, and limitations 17on the number of hens that may be kept, or vegetable gardens, 18including, but not limited to, regulations and ordinances 19relating to height, setback, water use, fertilizer use, or 20control of invasive or unlawful species in gardens, if that , 21provided that any such regulation or ordinance does not have 22the effect of precluding vegetable gardens or backyard 23chickens.24(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.)   HB4764- 5 -LRB104 18137 WRO 31576 b1    (505 ILCS 87/30 new)2    Sec. 30. Enforcement.3    (a) A person aggrieved by a violation of this Act may bring 4a civil action for declaratory and injunctive relief against a 5municipality that enforced or attempted to enforce an 6ordinance in violation of this Act.7    (b) A prevailing plaintiff shall be entitled to recover 8reasonable attorney's fees and court costs.9    (c) A plaintiff who paid a permit fee or other charge 10imposed under an ordinance that violates this Act may recover 11that fee upon request or through legal action.12    (d) This Act does not authorize damages other than those 13described in subsection (c).